Massachusetts, session 194th, H2363.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The department of public health shall commission a study of the admission
of patients to inpatient psychiatric hospitals directly from community behavioral health centers.
The study shall examine the feasibility of incentivizing inpatient psychiatric hospitals to admit
patients directly from community behavioral health centers.
SECTION 2. The department of public health shall file a report, including its findings on
the feasibility of offering incentives to inpatient psychiatric hospitals that admit patients directly
from community behavioral health centers and any recommendations on the implementation of
of 2

such incentives, with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the joint
committee on public health no later than January 1, 2027.
of 2